Utah statutes.
63M-1-1403.   Board duties.
(1)  The board shall:
(a)  have authority to approve a tourism program of out-of-state advertising,
marketing, and branding, taking into account the long-term strategic plan,
economic trends, and opportunities for tourism development on a statewide
basis, as a condition of the distribution of funds to the office from the
Tourism Marketing Performance Account under Section 63M-1-1406;
(b)  review the office programs for coordination and integration of
advertising and branding themes to be used whenever possible in all office
programs, including recreational, scenic, historic, and tourist attractions of
the state at large;
(c)  encourage and assist in coordination of the activities of persons, firms,
associations, corporations, civic groups, and governmental agencies engaged in
publicizing, developing, and promoting the scenic attractions and tourist
advantages of the state; and
(d) (i)  advise the office in establishing a Cooperative Program from the
money in the Tourism Marketing Performance Account under Section 63M-1-1406
for use by cities, counties, nonprofit destination marketing organizations,
and similar public entities for the purpose of supplementing money committed
by these entities for advertising and promotion to and for out-of-state
residents to attract them to visit sites advertised by and attend events
sponsored by these entities;
(ii)  the Cooperative Program shall be allocated 20% of the revenues
appropriated to the office from the Tourism Marketing Performance Account;
(iii)  the office, with approval from the board, shall establish eligibility,
advertising, and timing requirements and criteria and provide for an approval
process for applications;
(iv)  an application from an eligible applicant to receive money from the
Cooperative Program must be submitted on or before the appropriate date
established by the office; and
(v)  Cooperative Program money not used in each fiscal year shall be returned
to the Tourism Marketing Performance Account.
(2)  The board may:
(a)  solicit and accept contributions of money, services, and facilities from
any other sources, public or private and shall use these funds for promoting
the general interest of the state in tourism; and
(b)  establish subcommittees for the purpose of assisting the board in an
advisory role only.
(3)  The board may not, except as otherwise provided in Subsection (1)(a),
make policy related to the management or operation of the office.
